Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Chapter 17. Court Administrators

§ 9-17-1.
Establishment of office; appointment and compensation of court administrator.

The judges and chancellors of judicial districts, including chancery, circuit and county courts, may, in their discretion, jointly or independently, establish the office of court administrator in any county by an order entered on the minutes of each participating court in the county.

The establishment of the office of court administrator shall be accomplished by vote of a majority of the participating judges and chancellors in the county, and such court administrator shall be appointed by vote of a majority of the judges or chancellors and may be removed by a majority vote of the judges or chancellors. In case of a tie vote, the senior judge or senior chancellor shall cast two (2) votes.

The court administrator shall be provided office space in the same manner as such is afforded the judges and chancellors.

The annual salary of each court administrator appointed pursuant to this section shall be set by vote of the judges and chancellors of each participating county and shall be submitted to the Administrative Office of Courts for approval pursuant to Section 9-1-36. The salary shall be paid in twelve (12) installments on the last working day of the month by the Administrative Office of Courts after it has been authorized by the participating judges and chancellors and an order has been duly placed on the minutes of each participating court.

Any county within a judicial district having a court administrator shall transfer to the Administrative Office of Courts one-twelfth (1/12) of its pro rata cost of authorized compensation as defined in Section 9-1-36 for the court administrator by the twentieth day of each month for the compensation that is to be paid on the last day of that month. The board of supervisors may transfer the pro rata cost of the county from the funds of that county pursuant to Section 9-17-5(2)(b).

For all travel required in the performance of official duties, the court administrator shall be paid mileage by the county in which the duties were performed at the same rate as provided for state employees in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. The court administrator shall file a certificate of mileage expense incurred during that term with the board of supervisors of each participating county and payment of such expense shall be paid proportionately out of the court administration fund established pursuant to Section 9-17-5.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 531, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 41; Laws, 1994, ch. 506, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1994).

§ 9-17-3.
Duties of court administrator.

It shall be the duty of the court administrator to:

Perform all nonjudicial tasks of the court;

Maintain all statistical reports;

Serve as liaison with the general public and members of the bar;

Coordinate and assist in the duties of the clerks of the courts of the district related to the judicial duties of the clerks;

Provide general administrative support for all judges and chancellors of the district; and

Perform other duties assigned by the judges.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 531, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 9-17-5.
Court administration special fund.

In each county where a court administrator has been appointed pursuant to this chapter, a special fund in the county treasury is hereby established to be known as the “court administration fund.”

The judges and chancellors may apply their expense allowance in Section 9-1-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, to the court administration fund.

The board of supervisors of any county within a judicial district having a court administrator is authorized to pay its pro rata cost of the salary and furnish an equipped office for the court administrator and his staff from county funds. The board of supervisors is further authorized to accept grants, gifts, donations or federal funds for the benefit of the office of the court administrator.

The board of supervisors of any county within a judicial district having a court administrator is authorized, in its discretion, to charge, in addition to all other costs required by law, an amount not to exceed two dollars ($2.00) for each complaint filed in the chancery, circuit and county courts of such county. Any money collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid into the court administrator fund.

Money paid into the court administration fund under this chapter shall be applied to the office of the court administrator for the purpose of funding that office.

All expenditures made from the court administration fund shall be upon written requisition of the court administrator approved by a judge or chancellor to the county or counties of the district designated by him, in proportion to the business of his office in the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 531, § 4 1983, ch. 398, eff from and after July 1, 1983.